Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.471

Member—Dissent—Payment of fair value.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 25.15.481 or 25.15.491(2), or in a written limited liability company agreement, a member of a limited liability company is entitled to dissent from, and obtain payment of, the fair value of the member's interest in a limited liability company in the event of consummation of a plan of merger to which the limited liability company is a party as permitted by RCW 25.15.416.

(2) A member entitled to dissent and obtain payment for the member's interest in a limited liability company under this article may not challenge the merger creating the member's entitlement unless the merger fails to comply with the procedural requirements imposed by this chapter, Title 23B RCW, chapter 25.05 RCW, chapter 25.10 RCW, or the limited liability company agreement, or is fraudulent with respect to the member or the limited liability company.

(3) The right of a dissenting member in a limited liability company to obtain payment of the fair value of the member's interest in the limited liability company terminates upon the occurrence of any one of the following events:

(a) The proposed merger is abandoned or rescinded;

(b) A court having jurisdiction permanently enjoins or sets aside the merger; or

(c) The member's demand for payment is withdrawn with the written consent of the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 90.]